test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k49_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    verkur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: verkur
    verkur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: verk
    verkur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: verki
    verkur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: verks
    verkur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: verkir
    verkur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: verkir
    verkur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: verkjum
    verkur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: verkja
    verkur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: verkurin
    verkur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: verkin
    verkur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: verkinum
    verkur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: verksins
    verkur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: verkirnir
    verkur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: verkirnar
    verkur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: verkjunum
    verkur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: verkjanna
